Hawaii statutes.
[§302L-1.7] Early childhood
education facilities; pre-plus. (a) There is established the pre-plus
program within the office to expand access to affordable and high-quality early
childhood education for children from low-income families who are not otherwise
eligible for kindergarten, by allowing preschool programs to be established on
public school campuses through public-private partnerships.

(b) The office, the department of education,
and the department of human services shall work collaboratively to develop
suitable pre-plus classrooms on department of education campuses statewide,
including conversion charter school campuses. The executive office on early
learning, with the department of education and department of human services,
shall coordinate site selection for additional pre-plus programs at public
school sites, with priority given to public school sites that serve at-risk
children as defined in section 302L-1, including sites located in areas with
limited access to early learning programs and services. [L 2012, c 178, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next